Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND 2 Section 1. REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ 3 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 4 infrastructure fund created in section 8.57 to the following 5 departments and agencies for the fiscal year beginning July 6 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or 7 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 8 designated: 9 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES 10 For maintenance projects at the Terrace Hill facility: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 12 2. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 13 a. (1) For deposit in the water quality initiative fund 14 created in section 466B.45 for purposes of supporting the 15 water quality initiative administered by the division of soil 16 conservation and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , 17 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 18 purposes, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph 19 âcâ: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,200,000 21 (2) (a) The moneys appropriated in this lettered 22 paragraph shall be used to support demonstration projects in 23 subwatersheds as designated by the department that are part 24 of high-priority watersheds identified by the water resources 25 coordinating council. 26 (b) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 27 shall be used to support demonstration projects in watersheds 28 generally, including regional watersheds, as designated by the 29 division, and high-priority watersheds identified by the water 30 resources coordinating council. 31 (3) In supporting projects in watersheds and subwatersheds 32 as provided in subparagraph (2), all of the following apply: 33 (a) The demonstration projects must utilize water quality 34 practices as described in the latest revision of the document 35 -1- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 1/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ entitled âIowa Nutrient Reduction Strategyâ initially presented 1 in November 2012 by the department of agriculture and land 2 stewardship, the department of natural resources, and Iowa 3 state university of science and technology. 4 (b) The division shall implement demonstration projects 5 as provided in subparagraph division (a) by providing 6 for participation by persons who hold a legal interest 7 in agricultural land used in farming. To every extent 8 practicable, the division shall provide for collaborative 9 participation by such persons who hold a legal interest in 10 agricultural land located within the same subwatershed. 11 (c) The division shall implement demonstration projects on 12 a cost-share basis as determined by the division. Except for 13 edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the amount shall 14 not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of establishing the 15 practice as determined by the division or 50 percent of the 16 actual cost of establishing the practice, whichever is less. 17 (d) The demonstration projects shall be used to educate 18 other persons about the feasibility and value of establishing 19 similar water quality practices. The division shall promote 20 field day events for purposes of allowing interested persons to 21 establish water quality practices on such personsâ agricultural 22 land. 23 (e) The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 24 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 25 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 26 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 27 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 28 legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 29 land shall be a confidential record. 30 (4) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 31 shall be used to support education and outreach in a manner 32 that encourages persons who hold a legal interest in 33 agricultural land used for farming to implement water quality 34 practices, including the establishment of such practices in 35 -2- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 2/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ watersheds generally, and not limited to subwatersheds or 1 high-priority watersheds. 2 (5) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 3 may be used to contract with persons to coordinate the 4 implementation of efforts provided in this lettered paragraph. 5 (6) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 6 may be used by the department to support urban soil and water 7 conservation efforts, which may include but are not limited 8 to management practices related to bioretention, landscaping, 9 the use of permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality 10 restoration. The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share 11 basis as provided in chapter 161A . 12 (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 13 contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in this 14 lettered paragraph to carry out the provisions of this lettered 15 paragraph on a cost-share basis in combination with other 16 moneys available to the department from a state or federal 17 source. 18 (8) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 19 this lettered paragraph may be used for costs of administration 20 and implementation of the water quality initiative administered 21 by the division. 22 b. (1) For updating the maximum return to nitrogen modeling 23 system for fertilizer management, notwithstanding section 8.57, 24 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 26 (2) Any information received, collected, or held for 27 purposes of this lettered paragraph is a confidential record 28 exempt from public release if the information identifies a 29 person who holds a legal interest in agricultural land or who 30 has previously held a legal interest in agricultural land, 31 a person who is involved or who was previously involved in 32 managing the agricultural land or producing crops or livestock 33 on the agricultural land, or the identifiable location of the 34 agricultural land. 35 -3- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 3/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 3. DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND 1 For building repairs for the building located at 524 Fourth 2 Street, Des Moines, Iowa: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 4 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 5 For installing air conditioning at the Anamosa state 6 penitentiary and the Mount Pleasant correctional facility: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,137,500 8 5. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 9 a. For deposit in the community attraction and tourism 10 fund created in section 15F.204, notwithstanding section 8.57, 11 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 13 b. For deposit in the destination Iowa fund created in 14 section 15.281, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 15 paragraph âcâ: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 17 c. For a grant to an organization with a sports 18 entertainment venue in a city with a population between 15,550 19 and 15,800 according to the 2020 federal decennial census, to 20 be used for facility enhancement: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,000,000 22 d. For grants to nonprofit organizations committed to 23 strengthening communities through youth development, healthy 24 living, and social responsibility for costs associated with 25 the renovation and maintenance of facility infrastructure at 26 facilities located in cities with a population of less than 27 28,000 according to the 2020 federal decennial census: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 29 e. For deposit in the strategic infrastructure program fund 30 described in section 15.313, notwithstanding section 8.57, 31 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 33 f. For deposit in the local government shared-services 34 grant fund established in section 28E.20, if enacted by 2026 35 -4- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 4/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Iowa Acts, Senate Study Bill 3034, section 95, 2026 Iowa Acts, 1 House Study Bill 563, section 95, or successor legislation, 2 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 4 g. For a grant to a nonprofit organization located in a city 5 with a population between 2,000 and 3,000 according to the 2020 6 federal decennial census, for the creation of an interactive 7 museum exhibit at a presidential library, notwithstanding 8 section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 10 6. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 11 For repairing the roof of the Giangreco building: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,527,569 13 7. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY 14 For the construction of a firearms range at Camp Dodge: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,700,000 16 8. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 17 a. For implementation of lake projects that have 18 established watershed improvement initiatives and community 19 support in accordance with the departmentâs annual lake 20 restoration plan and report, notwithstanding section 8.57, 21 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,600,000 23 b. For state park infrastructure improvements: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 25 c. For water trails and low head dam safety grants, 26 including grants for projects relating to eligible water 27 bodies, as defined in section 456A.33C, notwithstanding section 28 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 30 d. For providing funding assistance to eligible 31 communities, as described in section 455E.11, subsection 2, 32 paragraph âaâ, subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (d), 33 to address abandoned buildings by promoting waste abatement, 34 diversion, selective dismantlement of building components, 35 -5- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 5/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ and recycling, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 1 paragraph âcâ: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 3 9. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE 4 a. For major maintenance projects at national guard 5 armories and facilities: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 7 b. For improvement projects for Iowa national guard 8 installations and readiness centers to support operations and 9 training requirements: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 11 c. For construction improvement projects at the Camp Dodge 12 facility: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 550,000 14 d. The department of public defense shall report to the 15 general assembly by December 15, 2026, regarding the projects 16 the department has funded or intends to fund from moneys 17 appropriated to the department pursuant to this subsection. 18 10. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 19 For payments and other costs due under a financing agreement 20 entered into by the treasurer of state for building the 21 statewide interoperable communications system pursuant to 22 section 29C.23, subsection 2, notwithstanding section 8.57, 23 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,846,011 25 11. BOARD OF REGENTS 26 a. For allocation by the state board of regents to the 27 state university of Iowa, Iowa state university of science 28 and technology, and the university of northern Iowa to 29 reimburse the institutions for deficiencies in the operating 30 funds resulting from the pledging of tuition, student fees 31 and charges, and institutional income to finance the cost of 32 providing academic and administrative buildings and facilities 33 and utility services at the institutions: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,000,000 35 -6- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 6/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ b. For the renovation and construction of the public policy 1 center at the commons at the university of northern Iowa: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 3 c. For the renovation and construction of the nursing 4 simulation laboratory at the state university of Iowa: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,000,000 6 12. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 7 a. For acquiring, constructing, and improving recreational 8 trails within the state: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 10 b. For deposit in the public transit infrastructure grant 11 fund created in section 324A.6A, for projects that meet 12 the definition of vertical infrastructure in section 8.57, 13 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,200,000 15 c. For deposit in the railroad revolving loan and grant 16 fund created in section 327H.20A, notwithstanding section 8.57, 17 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 19 d. For vertical infrastructure improvements at commercial 20 service airports within the state: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,900,000 22 e. For vertical infrastructure improvements at general 23 aviation airports within the state: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 25 13. TREASURER OF STATE 26 For distribution in accordance with chapter 174 to qualified 27 fairs that belong to the association of Iowa fairs for county 28 fair vertical infrastructure improvements: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,060,000 30 Sec. 2. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless 31 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated 32 moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act 33 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 34 the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 35 -7- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 7/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the 1 appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for 2 which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier 3 fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at 4 the close of that same fiscal year. 5 DIVISION II 6 TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND 7 Sec. 3. TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND ââ 8 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the technology 9 reinvestment fund created in section 8.57C to the following 10 departments and agencies for the fiscal year beginning July 11 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or 12 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 13 designated: 14 1. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 15 For technology projects and upgrades: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 697,425 17 2. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 18 a. (1) For the continued development and implementation 19 of an educational data warehouse that will be utilized by 20 teachers, parents, school district administrators, area 21 education agency staff, department of education staff, and 22 policymakers: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 24 (2) Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 25 the department may use a portion for an e-transcript data 26 system capable of tracking students throughout the studentsâ 27 education via interconnectivity with multiple schools. 28 b. For maintenance and lease costs associated with 29 connections for part III of the Iowa communications network: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,727,000 31 3. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES 32 a. For costs associated with the design, development, and 33 implementation of a new eligibility determination system: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 19,897,695 35 -8- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 8/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ b. For costs associated with integrating data sources into a 1 new eligibility determination system: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,633,361 3 c. For costs associated with implementing Medicaid work 4 requirements, new eligibility redetermination requirements, 5 and required information technology changes pursuant to 6 federal Pub. L. No. 119-21, commonly referred to as the One Big 7 Beautiful Bill Act: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,473,690 9 d. For technology costs associated with the state poison 10 control center: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 42,080 12 4. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT 13 For the continuing implementation of a statewide mass 14 notification and emergency messaging system: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 16 5. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT 17 a. For the continued development and implementation of 18 a searchable database that can be placed on the internet for 19 budget and financial information: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 45,000 21 b. For the continued development and implementation of the 22 comprehensive electronic grant management system: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 70,000 24 c. For the upgrade of the local government budget and 25 property tax system: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 27 d. For the annual licensing of a searchable database that is 28 placed on the internet for budget and financial information: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 358,429 30 e. For the security office of the chief information 31 officer, including for statewide endpoint detection and 32 response, cybersecurity incident investigation response, and 33 miscellaneous purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,947,658 35 -9- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 9/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ f. For the cost of equipment and computer software for the 1 continued development and implementation of Iowaâs criminal 2 justice information system: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,400,000 4 g. For costs associated with the justice enterprise data 5 warehouse: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 282,664 7 h. For costs associated with the enterprise artificial 8 intelligence capacity expansion: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,510,000 10 i. For costs associated with the modernization of the 11 mobile architecture and communications handling program and the 12 traffic and criminal software program: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 14 6. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 15 For costs associated with a new digital evidence management 16 system: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 18 7. TREASURER OF STATE 19 a. For the purchase of software relating to investment 20 tracking: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 192,000 22 b. For the purchase of software relating to banking 23 reconciliations: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 228,000 25 Sec. 4. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless 26 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated 27 moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act 28 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 29 the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 30 ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the 31 appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for 32 which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier 33 fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at 34 the close of that same fiscal year. 35 -10- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 10/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 5. Section 8.57C, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 3. a. There is appropriated from the general fund of 3 the state to the technology reinvestment fund for the fiscal 4 year beginning July 1, 2026 2027 , and for each fiscal year 5 thereafter, the sum of seventeen million five hundred thousand 6 dollars. 7 b. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 8 infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 9 2025 2026 , and ending June 30, 2026 2027 , the sum of eighteen 10 million two hundred sixty-nine thousand two hundred seventeen 11 thirty-nine million nine hundred twenty-five thousand two 12 dollars to the technology reinvestment fund, notwithstanding 13 section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . 14 DIVISION III 15 CHANGES TO PRIOR APPROPRIATIONS 16 Sec. 6. 2023 Iowa Acts, chapter 118, section 2, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 SEC. 2. REVERSION. 19 1. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically 20 provided in subsection 2 or otherwise, unencumbered or 21 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division 22 of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for 23 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 24 the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the 25 fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, 26 if the project or projects for which such appropriation was 27 made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered 28 or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same 29 fiscal year. 30 2. For purposes of section 8.33, unencumbered or 31 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 32 subsection 12, paragraph âfâ, of this 2023 Iowa Act shall not 33 revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 34 purposes designated until December 31, 2026. 35 -11- LSB 5017XG (3) 91 th/ns 11/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 7. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 2, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 SEC. 2. REVERSION. 3 1. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically 4 provided in subsection 2 or otherwise, unencumbered or 5 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division 6 of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for 7 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 8 the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the 9 fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, 10 if the project or projects for which such appropriation was 11 made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered 12 or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same 13 fiscal year. 14 2. For purposes of section 8.33, unencumbered or 15 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 16 subsection 5, paragraph âeâ, of this 2024 Iowa Act shall not 17 revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 18 purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 19 ends three years after the end of the fiscal year for which 20 the appropriation was made, or until the project for which the 21 appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 22 Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 23 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 24